Hawaii statutes.
[§451K-14] Hearings; appeals. The
director shall establish a hearing and appeals process for persons to appeal
the revocation, suspension, denial, or condition of a license. [L 2009, c 191,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next